src/morphology/affixes/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ACCUSATIVE_T

+Sg+Acc:%>t	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>hän	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/ko:%>hän%>kö	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä	# ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kään	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/ko:%>kään%>kö	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä	# ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/ko:%>kin%>kö	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä	# ;

+Foc/ko:%>kö	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/s:%>kö%>s	# ;

+Foc/pa:%>pä	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/ko:%>pä%>kö	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s	# ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT_KA

+Foc/ka:%>kä	# ;

+Foc/ka:%>kä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_S ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_KA_S

:	# ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_S ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_KA ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT_S

:	# ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_S ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_CLIT_S

+Foc/s:%>s	# ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>i%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>i	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N

+Sg+Gen:%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN

+Pl+Gen:%>ten	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:h%>i%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:h%>i%>e	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:h%>i%>tten	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:h%>i%>tte	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:h%>i%>sin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:h%>i%>si	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Par+Use/Arch:h%>i%>ä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Use/Arch:h	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Ill:%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>e	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>he	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN

+Sg+Ill:%>hen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN

+Sg+Ill:%>hän	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:%>i%>hin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN

+Sg+Ill:%>seen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE

+Sg+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>tä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Par:%>j%>ä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ

+Sg+Par:%>tä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN

+Sg+Par:%>ä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_0

+Pl+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_T

+Pl+Nom:%>t	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PLURALS

:	PRON_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

:	PRON_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT

+Px3:%>nsä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

#;

LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS

+Px3:%>nsä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

+Px3:%>än	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>hän	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS

:	PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

:	PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS

+Sg+Ess:%>nä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ess:%>nä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS

+Sg+Abe:%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>llä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>stä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_T ;


LEXICON PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Abe:%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>llä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>stä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse	PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PLNOM_T ;
