src/morphology/stems/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRONOUN
me+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abe:meittä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
me+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ine:meissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
te+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ela+Err/Orth:teist     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
he+Pron+Pers+Pl3+All:heille    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
hää+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Use/NG+Dial/East:hää    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
meitti+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ela+Use/NG+Dial/West:meittissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
teitti+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom+Use/NG+Dial/West:teitti    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
tämä+Pron+Dem+Sg+All:tälle    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
se+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ade:siellä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
nämä+Pron+Dem+Pl+Par:näitä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
tää+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:tää   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela:keistä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:ketkäs    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:kenessäkäs    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
mikä+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:missäkä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc:ketkäs   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Rel+Sg+Abe:kenettäkäs   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
mikä+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins:minkä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
mikä+Pron+Rel+Sg+Tra+Use/NG:miksikäs     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
mikin+Pron+Qu+Sg+Abl:miltäkin     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
kukaan+Pron+Qu+Sg+Abl:keltään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
yksikään+Pron+Qu+Pl+All:yksillekään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
eräs+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill:eräisiin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
yksi+Pron+Qu+Indef+Pl+Tra:yksiksi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ade+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteillä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+All+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteille  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteine  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela+Use/NG+Dial/West:iteistä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ess+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteinä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:ite  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ill+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteihin PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteissä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ins+Use/NG+Dial/West:ittein  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom+Use/NG+Dial/West:itte  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:ite  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Par+Use/NG+Dial/West:ittejä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Tra+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteiksi    PRON_FRONT_CLIT   ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Tra+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteikse    PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Abl+Use/NG+Dial/West:iteltä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ade+Use/NG+Dial/West:itellä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+All+Use/NG+Dial/West:itelle  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela+Use/NG+Dial/West:itestä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ess+Use/NG+Dial/West:ittenä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:ite  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteen  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine+Use/NG+Dial/West:itessä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ins+Use/NG+Dial/West:iten    PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:ite  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Par+Use/NG+Dial/West:itteä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Tra+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:itekse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Tra+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteksi  PRON_FRONT_CLIT   ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Abl+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:iteiltä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ade:itseillä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+All:itseille  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Com:itseine  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ela:itseistä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ess:itseinä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen:itse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Gen:itsee  PRON_FRONT_POSS  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ill:itseihin  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ill:itseihin  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ine:itseissä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Ins:itsein    PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:itse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Par:itsejä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Tra:itseiksi  PRON_FRONT_CLIT   ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Pl+Tra:itseikse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Abl:itseltä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ade:itsellä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+All:itselle  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ela:itsestä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ess:itsenä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen:itse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill:itseen    PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ine:itsessä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ins:itsen PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:itse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT   ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Tra:itsekse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
itse+Pron+Refl+Sg+Tra:itseksi   PRON_FRONT_CLIT   ;
